Massachusetts, session 194th, H1826.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11K of chapter 12 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. Section 4 of chapter 258B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following 2 subsections:-
(f) administer the provisions of chapter 258C through the Massachusetts office for victim
assistance.
(g) The executive director, appointed by the board, shall have the authority to promulgate
rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 30A as may be necessary to carry out this chapter.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 258C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended by inserting before the definition of “Catastrophic injury” the following
definition:-
of 7

“Agency”, the Massachusetts office for victim assistance, which administers the
provisions of chapter 258B on behalf of the victim and witness assistance board.
SECTION 4. Said section 1 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking the definition of “Department”.
SECTION 5. Said section 1 of said chapter 258C, as so amended, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 32, 64 and 65, the word “his”, each time it appears, and
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the words:- the victim’s.
SECTION 6. Said section 1 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking the definition of “Division” and inserting in place thereof the following
definition:-
“Director”, the executive director of the Massachusetts office for victim assistance or the
executive director’s designee.
SECTION 7. Section 2 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 2, 9, 29, 40 and 41, the word “division”, each time it appears, and inserting
in place thereof, in each instance, the word:- agency.
SECTION 8. Said section 2 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 17, the word “he”, and inserting in place thereof the words:- the
claimant.
SECTION 9. Section 3 of chapter 258C of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 140
of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 27 and 28, the word “program”.
of 7

SECTION 10. Said section 3 of said chapter 258C, as so amended, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 61 and 68, the word “he”, each time it appears, and inserting in
place thereof, in each instance, the words:- the victim.
SECTION 11. Said section 3 of said chapter 258C, as so amended, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 73, the word “his”, and inserting in place thereof the words:- the
victim’s.
SECTION 12. Chapter 258C of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
section 4 as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition and inserting in place thereof the following
section:-
Section 4. (a) The agency shall administer the provisions of this chapter. The director
may appoint and remove such investigative, legal and clerical or other staff as the work of the
agency requires.
(b) The director may promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 30A as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The director may apply for and receive sums which may be transmitted to the victim
compensation fund maintained by the treasurer and for any other such funds as may become
available to administer the requirements of this chapter.
SECTION 13. Section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 4, the word “he”, and inserting in place thereof the words:- the claimant.
of 7

SECTION 14. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 6, 18, 20 and 26, the word “division”, each time it appears, and
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the word:- agency.
SECTION 14A. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 20, the words “an investigation”, and inserting in place thereof
the words:- a review.
SECTION 15. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 22, the word “division”, and inserting in place thereof the
words:- agency, through the attorney general,.
SECTION 16. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 33, the word “him”, and inserting in place thereof the word:- the
person.
SECTION 17. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 33, the words “attorney general”, and inserting in place thereof
the words:- agency, through the attorney general,.
SECTION 18. Section 6 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 2, the word “division”, and inserting in place thereof the word:- agency.
SECTION 19. Chapter 258C of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
section 7 as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition and inserting in place thereof the following
section:-
of 7

Section 7. Within 15 days of completion of the claims review, the director shall notify the
claimant of compensation to be paid or denied, and the reasons therefor, and issue payment in
accordance with regulations established under this chapter. The notice shall contain information
regarding the right of the claimant to petition for judicial review of the decision of the director.
SECTION 20. Section 8 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 2, 4, 5, 8, 11 and 16, the word “program”.
SECTION 21. Said section 8 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 5, the word “his”, and inserting in place thereof the words:- the
director’s.
SECTION 22. Section 9 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 2, 6, 9, 11 and 42, the word “program”.
SECTION 23. Said section 9 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 12, the word “his”, and inserting in place thereof the words:- the
director’s.
SECTION 24. Subsection (e) of said subsection 9 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by striking out the fourth and fifth sentences and inserting in place
thereof the following 2 sentences:-
The clerk of the court shall immediately notify the claimant in writing of the decision and
shall forward to the agency a certified copy of the decision. The agency without further
authorization shall, subject to appropriation, pay the claimant the amount determined by the
court.
of 7

SECTION 25. Said subsection (e) of said subsection 9 of said chapter 258C, as so
appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 33, 34, 37, 40 and 41, the word
“his”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the words:- the
victim’s.
SECTION 26. Section 11 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “attorney general”, and inserting in place thereof the
words:- agency.
SECTION 27. Said section 11 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 7, the words “attorney general”, and inserting in place thereof
100 the words:- agency, through the attorney general,.
101 SECTION 28. Said section 11 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended
102 by striking out, in line 8, the word “he”.
103 SECTION 29. Section 12 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
104 striking out, in line 4, the word “division”, and inserting in place thereof the word:- agency.
105 SECTION 30. Said section 12 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended
106 by inserting after the word “general”, in line 15, the following words:- , representing the agency,.
107 SECTION 31. Chapter 258C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
108 following section:-
109 Section 15. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all records and information
110 received, obtained or maintained by the agency in connection with any claim for crime victim
of 7

111 compensation shall be confidential and privileged. All records and information shall not
112 be disclosed by the agency or by anyone who receives such records or information from the
113 agency.
114 (b) Nothing in this section shall preclude disclosure of records or information:
115 (i) for the processing of a claim by the agency or responding to an action in court seeking
116 review of a decision by the agency;
117 (ii) consisting of information exchanged between the claimant or the claimant’s
118 authorized representative and the agency, provided that the claimant or the claimant’s authorized
119 representative consents to such disclosure in writing; or
120 (iii) upon a lawful order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.
121 SECTION 32. This act shall take effect 180 days after passage.
of 7